Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-103
Commission; signature; seal; filing and approval of bond; delivery.

When any person is appointed to the office of notary public, the Secretary of State shall cause his or her signature or a facsimile thereof to be affixed to the commission and he or she shall affix thereto the great seal of the state. Upon the filing and approval of the bond, as provided for in section 64-102, the Secretary of State shall mail or deliver the commission to the applicant. The form and format of the commission shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State.

Laws 1869, § 2, p. 21;

G.S.1873, p. 493;

R.S.1913, § 5518;

C.S.1922, § 4814;

C.S.1929, § 64-102;

R.S.1943, § 64-103;

Laws 1945, c. 145, § 3, p. 489;

Laws 1963, c. 368, § 1, p. 1186;

Laws 1967, c. 396, § 4, p. 1243;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 48;

Laws 2004, LB 315, § 5.